Connecticut, session 2026, SB00115.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That section 12-412 of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes be
amended to exempt from the sales and use taxes the sale of and the
storage, use or other consumption in this state of COVID-19 at-home test
kits.